South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S495.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Building Codes Council, relating to Continuing Education for Code Enforcement Officers, designated as Regulation Document Number 5306, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Building Codes Council proposes to amend R.8-150(6)(F) regarding the limitation on reimbursement for continuing education to 12 hours per year for building code enforcement officers. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on July 26, 2024. ----XX----